Idaho, session 2026, H0747.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 39-2804, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-2804. POWERS AND DUTIES OF ABATEMENT DISTRICTS. The abatement dis-
trict board of trustees is authorized:
(1) To appoint a director to direct the activities of the district, in
accordance with training and experience necessary to fulfill the duties of
the position.;
(2) To appoint such other persons as necessary, determine their duties
and compensation, and make rules and regulations respecting them.;
(3) To take all necessary and proper steps for the control of mosquitoes
and other vermin of public health and welfare importance in the district and
for these purposes shall have the right to enter upon any and all lands.;
(4) To sue and be sued.;
(5) To contract to purchase, hold, dispose of, and acquire by gift real
and personal property in the name of the district. To exercise the right
of eminent domain and for these purposes to condemn any necessary land or
rights-of-way in accordance with general law.;
(6) To abate as nuisance breeding places of mosquitoes or other ver-
min of public health and welfare importance within the district or within
migrating distance of the district by use of chemicals or permanent control
measures and in this connection have the right to enter upon on any and all
public lands.;
(7) To work with the lateral ditch water users associations, irriga-
tion, drainage and flood control districts and other cooperating organi-
zations. The board of trustees of the abatement district may supplement
funds of cooperating organizations for improvement, repair, maintenance,
and cleaning of ditches which that will temporarily or permanently eliminate
mosquito breeding or for other activities which that will benefit the dis-
trict.;
(8) To file annually with the board of county commissioners for their
approval an estimate of funds required for the next year, a plan of the work
to be done, and methods to be employed. No procedure, work, or contract for


any year of operation shall be done or entered upon into until plans and bud-
get have been jointly approved by the board of county commissioners.;
(9) To file, annually or by February 1 of the succeeding year, with the
board of county commissioners a report setting forth the moneys expended
during the previous year, methods employed, and work accomplishments.; and
(10) To approve a written mosquito or other vermin management plan
submitted by a landowner requesting that their property be excluded from
treatment by the abatement district. Such plan must be specific to the
landowner's property, provide adequate control measures, and be implemented
by the landowner. The abatement district shall refrain from treatment of
property included in the approved plan, but shall maintain monitoring and
surveillance activities. If the landowner fails to follow the plan or does
not provide adequate control measures, the abatement district may abate the
mosquitoes or other vermin.
(11) (10) To cooperate with other entities. At its discretion, a dis-
trict may cooperate with and enter into annual agreements or contract with
governmental agencies of this state, other states, agencies of the federal
government, private associations, and private individuals in order to carry
out the purposes and provisions of this chapter.
SECTION 2. That Section 39-2812, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-2812. PESTS -- PUBLIC HEALTH AND WELFARE -- DISASTERS -- EMERGEN-
CIES -- INTERIM ABATEMENT DISTRICTS. (1) To provide for the timely response
to an elevated or anticipated pest population that may constitute a risk
to public health and welfare, the board of county commissioners of each
county of this state, in collaboration with duly recognized local and state
officials, and after a public hearing is called for such purpose as a spe-
cial meeting pursuant to the provisions of section 74-204(2), Idaho Code,
is hereby granted full power and authority to declare such pests as public
health and welfare pests, and to initiate activities to hinder in the poten-
tial spread of disease, or adverse economic impact, caused by these pests by
taking appropriate steps to intervene in the natural biological cycle of the
pests or disease.
(2) Boards of county commissioners are further authorized and empow-
ered, in the event of a disaster or emergency declared by such boards, to
make direct appropriations for the purpose of controlling public health and
welfare pests as declared pursuant to this section. All moneys raised by
direct appropriation shall be placed in a county public health and welfare
pest fund, which shall be used exclusively for the control of pests of public
health and welfare significance and for payment of all necessary expenses
incurred in such control program. In addition, the county may impose an an-
nual property tax assessment pursuant to section 39-2805, Idaho Code, and
in accordance with the provisions of sections 63-802 and 63-803, Idaho Code,
for the term of the disaster or emergency or until all expenses incurred dur-
ing the disaster or emergency have been recovered. Such fund shall be a re-
volving fund and all moneys returned to the fund under any of the provisions
of this chapter shall continue to be available for the operation of the con-
trol program.


(3) The disaster or emergency declaration of a pest of public health
and welfare significance within a county and subsequent pest management
activity shall, except as provided herein, place the whole county into an
interim abatement district for administrative purposes for no more than two
(2) years. The transition of an interim abatement district into a formally
defined abatement district, shall be brought to a vote of the electorate
within twenty-four (24) months of the declaration, subject to the notifica-
tion and establishment requirements provided in this chapter, and conducted
during a general election held on the first Tuesday following the first Mon-
day in November of even-numbered years, and if passed, the district shall be
recognized and the provisions of this chapter shall be implemented. If the
measure fails, the balance of revolving fund moneys shall be distributed as
required by state law. In the event the disaster or emergency exceeds the
county's capacity or resources, provisions should be made to request state
or federal disaster or emergency funds to address the evolving situation.
If the interim abatement district provides the same service as an existing
abatement district, the interim abatement district shall exclude any area
within an existing abatement district.
(4) Aerial abatement methods shall be used to deploy adulticides within
an abatement district only when the respective board of county commissioners
has declared a health emergency. In such cases, aerial adulticide abatement
methods may be used only to treat property within the abatement district that
has not been exempted pursuant to section 39-2814, Idaho Code.
(a) The restriction provided by this subsection shall not apply to
aerial abatement methods deploying a larvicide on properties that have
not been excluded.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection, "aerial abatement methods"
means abatement using planes, drones, or similar apparatuses.
(5) At least ten (10) days prior to the start of any abatement season,
the abatement district shall publish notice.
(a) Such notice shall:
(i) Describe the abatement activity, location, and methods to be
used;
(ii) Disclose all possible products authorized for use during the
abatement season; and
(iii) Provide information on how to opt out of abatement-related
activities.
(b) The notice shall be:
(i) Published on the district's and the county's website, if such
entities have websites;
(ii) Published monthly in a newspaper of general circulation
within the district; and
(iii) Circulated regularly online and by other means that the
district determines likely to provide affected landowners notice
throughout the abatement season.
SECTION 3. That Chapter 28, Title 39, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 39-2814, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:


39-2814. PARTICIPATION IN ABATEMENT DISTRICTS BY PROPERTY OWNERS. (1)
An individual who owns property within an abatement district may submit a
written notice that includes the physical address of the property to the
board of county commissioners for the county in which the property is located
requesting that the property be exempted from any and all abatement-related
activities. The notice shall remain in effect until the owner of the prop-
erty rescinds the notice in writing.
(2)(a) In the event that a government agent knowingly allows abatement-
related activities to occur on, over, or above an exempted property, the
owner may:
(i) Submit evidence of the violation to the respective board of
county commissioners; and
(ii) Initiate a civil action against the respective board of
county commissioners and abatement district.
(b) If a court determines that a violation of this chapter occurred:
(i) The board of county commissioners shall be subject to a one
thousand dollar ($1,000) fine for each violation, which shall be
paid to the aggrieved owner; and
(ii) The court shall award reasonable attorney's fees and costs to
the prevailing party.
SECTION 4. That Section 39-2814, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-2814 39-2815. SEVERABILITY. The provisions of this chapter are
hereby declared to be severable and if any provision of this chapter or the
application of such provision to any person or circumstance is declared in-
valid for any reason, such declaration shall not affect the validity of the
remaining portions of this chapter.
SECTION 5. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.